src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ÅLGGO !!= @CODE@ Like MUORRA, but with comparatives. This lexicon was previously without sg ill/ine/elat, but these nouns can be conjugated for regular location cases. However, "adverbs" like ålggot (from outside), nuorttan (at north), oarjas (to south), etc., are more commonly used to denote location/direction (should therefore maybe consider subing the regular location case forms).
                                         :%>           NE-EVENCASE          ;
                                  +Sg+Gen:%>Q1         K-VOW                    ;
                                  +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v        K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Sg+Ill:%>X4j        K-CONS                    ; ! X4 for the e:á and e:å alternation
                                  +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n        K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s        K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Err/Orth+Sg+Ela:%>Q1stØ1        K-CONS                    ; !Old form used in Anta Pirak
                                  +Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn     K-CONS                    ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
                                  +Pl+Nom:%>Q1         K-VOW                    ;
                                  +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j        K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt       K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda      K-VOW                    ;
                                  +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn       K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js       K-CONS                    ;
                                  +Pl+Com:%>Q1j        K-CONS                    ;
                         +Err/Orth+Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jna    K-VOW                    ; !
                                     +Abe:%>Q1dak      K-CONS               ;
                              +Use/NG+Abe:%>Q1da       K-VOW               ;
!                                 +Sg+Gen:%>Q1         PxV                  ; !Possessive suffixes
!                                 +Sg+Acc:%>Q1         PxV                  ; !
!                                 +Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn%>   PxC                  ; !
!                                 +Pl+Nom:%>Q1         PxNomPlV             ; !
!                                 +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j%>      PxC                  ; !
!                                 +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jd%>     PxC                  ; !
!                                 +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jdis%>   PxCs                 ; !
!                                 +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn%>     PxC                  ; !
!                                 +Pl+Ela:%>Q1jst%>    PxC                  ; !
!                                 +Pl+Com:%>Q1j%>      PxC                  ; !
                                         :»            DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                                         :»            DenominalAdjsV1      ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
                                         :»X7          DenominalAdjsV2      ; !lasj
                                +Err/Orth:»            DenominalAdjsV2      ; !Err/Orth -lasj strong grade and without vowel changes, makes ájggelasj
                                +Err/Orth:»Z2          DenominalAdjsV2      ; !Err/Orth -lasj strong grade and with vowel changes, makes ájggálasj
                                +Err/Orth:»Q1          DenominalAdjsV2      ; !Err/Orth -lasj weak grade but without vowel changes, makes ájgelasj 
                                         :%>           MUORRACmp            ;
                                         :%>Q1         BU/MUS               ;
!                                     +Der1+Der/Comp+A:%>Q1        BUStem               ;
!                                   +Der1+Der/Superl+A:%>Q1muss    BUOREMUS             ;
              +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom:»Q1busj%>   K-CONS                    ;
             +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Attr:»Q1busj%>   ATTR                 ;
                     +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»Q1buttja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ;
  +Der1+Der/Comp+A+Der2+Der/Dimin+A:»Q1budtja%> GÅNÅGIS-EVEN         ; ! Gives ålggobudtjaj, barely not in use.
!                                 +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n       K-CONS                   ;
!                                 +Sg+Ine:%>Q1n%>     PxC                  ; !^P^
!                                 +Sg+Ela:%>Q1s       K-CONS                   ;
!                                 +Sg+Ela:%>Q1st%>    PxC                  ; !^P^
                                         :Q1          DAGI_SINGULAR                     ;
                                         :Q1          DAGI_PLURAL                       ;


!!€gt-norm: lulle # Even-syllable test
!!€ lulle:               lulle+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ lulev:               lulle+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ lulep:               lulle+N+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom



LEXICON MIEHTE !!= @CODE@ Like MUORRA but no locative/elative/illative sg. Presently no words in this lexica except for err subed nuortto
                  :%>         NE-EVENCASE          ;
           +Sg+Gen:%>Q1       K-VOW                    ;
           +Sg+Acc:%>Q1v      K-CONS                   ;
  +Err/Orth+Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jna  K-VOW                    ; !
           +Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn   K-CONS                   ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
           +Pl+Nom:%>Q1       K-VOW                    ;
           +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j      K-CONS                   ;
           +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jt     K-CONS                   ;
           +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jda    K-VOW                    ;
           +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn     K-CONS                   ;
           +Pl+Ela:%>Q1js     K-CONS                   ;
           +Pl+Com:%>Q1j      K-CONS                   ;
           +Sg+Gen:%>Q1       PxV                  ; ! Possessive suffixes
           +Sg+Acc:%>Q1       PxV                  ; !
           +Sg+Com:%>Q1X5jn%> PxC                  ; !
           +Pl+Nom:%>Q1       PxNomPlV             ; !
           +Pl+Gen:%>Q1j%>    PxC                  ; !
           +Pl+Acc:%>Q1jd%>   PxC                  ; !
           +Pl+Ill:%>Q1jdis%> PxCs                 ; !
           +Pl+Ine:%>Q1jn%>   PxC                  ; !
           +Pl+Ela:%>Q1jst%>  PxC                  ; !
           +Pl+Com:%>Q1j%>    PxC                  ; !
              +Abe:%>Q1dak    K-CONS              ;
       +Use/NG+Abe:%>Q1da     K-VOW              ;
                  :»          DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
                  :»          DenominalAdjsV1      ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
                  :»X7        DenominalAdjsV2      ;
                  :%>         MUORRACmp            ;
                  :%>Q1       DAGI_SINGULAR        ;
                  :%>Q1       DAGI_PLURAL          ;

!          +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n      K-CONS                   ;
!          +N+Sg+Ine:%>Q1n%>    PxC                  ; !^P^
!          +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1s      K-CONS                   ;
!          +N+Sg+Ela:%>Q1st%>   PxC                  ; !^P^

!!€gt-norm: nuortto # Even-syllable test
!!€ nuortto:               nuortto+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ nuortov:               nuortto+N+Sg+Acc



!! ### Plural stems
! - - - - - -
