src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
alle+N+Sem/Plc:alle ÅLGGO ;
davve+N+Sem/Plc:davve ÅLGGO ; !
lulle+N+Sem/Dummytag:lulle ÅLGGO ;
maŋŋe+N+Sem/Dummytag:maŋŋe ÅLGGO ;
nuortta+N+Sem/Plc:nuortta ÅLGGO ; !
nuortto+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Wthr:nuortte MIEHTE ; !
oarjje+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:oarjje ÅLGGO ; !
vuolle+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Part_Plc_Prod-audio:vuolle ÅLGGO ; !
ålggo+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ålgºgo ÅLGGO ; !should be in lexicon NOADE, but NOADE dosn´t get comparatives
ålggo+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ålggo ÅLGGO ;
